District of Columbia statutes.
47-4809

Efficiency.

The Department may pursue methods of enhancing the efficiency of the District of Columbia low-income housing tax credit program, including,

(1)

Pursuing opinions from the United States Department of Treasury’s Internal Revenue Service in the form of:

(A)

General Counsel memoranda;

(B)

Private letter rulings and other notices,:

(C)

Rulings; or

(D)

Guidelines; and

(2)

Reviewing other state low-income housing tax programs that have an option for taxpayers to receive such tax credit in the form of a loan generated by transferring the credit to a designated state entity.

Feb. 26, 2015, D.C. Law 20-155, § 7142(b), 61 DCR 9990